Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB114.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 9, 1997 (P.L.169, No.14), known as the Nurse Aide Resident Abuse Prevention Training Act, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 3.1. Training for long-term care.The department shall:(1) Develop and implement a long-term care curriculum for nurse aides.(2) Establish qualifications for individuals to conduct training of the long-term care curriculum. The qualifications shall include, at a minimum, that an instructor must be a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse under the 123456789101112131415161718 supervision of a registered nurse as defined in 49 Pa. Code § 21.1 (relating to definitions).(3) Establish a training program to implement a train-the-trainer model so that trainers are able to deliver the long-term care curriculum to nurse aides in this Commonwealth. If the training of a nurse aide is performed by a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse under the general supervision of a registered nurse:(i) the registered nurse must be available to the licensed practical nurse; and(ii) the registered nurse must have a minimum of two years of nursing experience, with at least 12 months of employment in a long-term care nursing facility.(4) Review a facility's application for approval to establish a training program. If the department fails to approve an initial application within 45 calendar days of receipt, the application shall be deemed approved. If the department fails to approve a revised application within 15 days of receipt, the application shall be deemed approved.Section 3.2. Criteria for nurse aides.(a) Competency examination.--In order to become a nurse aide in this Commonwealth, an individual must DO ONE OF THE FOLLOWING : (1) Successfully complete a State-approved nurse aide curriculum and training program or the long-term care curriculum for nurse aides and achieve a minimum score, established by the department, on the nurse aide competency examination, which shall consist of:(i) a written portion that may be taken, at the option of the individual, in person or remotely over the 20250SB0114PN0751 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Internet; and(ii) a skills-demonstrated portion approved by the department and administered at a site and instructor approved by the department.(2) Be a graduate of an accredited registered nurse or licensed practical nursing program and achieve a minimum score, established by the department, on the nurse aide competency examination.(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, be a student nurse or graduate nurse that has completed courses through a nursing program that is equivalent to the requirements of the nurse aide training program and achieves a minimum score as required by the department on the nurse aide competency examination.(b) Facility proctoring of the competency evaluation.--(1) The competency evaluation may, at the prospective nurse aide's option, be conducted at the facility in which the prospective nurse aide is or will be employed unless the facility is described in 42 CFR 483.151(b)(2) (relating to state review and approval of nurse aide training and competency evaluation programs).(2) The department may permit the competency evaluation to be proctored by facility personnel if the department finds that the procedure adopted by the facility ensures that the competency evaluation program:(i) is secure from tampering;(ii) is standardized and scored by a testing, educational or other organization approved by the department; and(iii) requires no scoring by facility personnel.20250SB0114PN0751 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3.3. Limitation on department.The department may not impose on a provider of a State-approved nurse aide program a waiting period between approval of the training program and the offering of any portion of the training online as authorized under section 9 . Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of section 3.1(1), (2) and (3) of the act shall take effect in one year.(2) The addition of section 3.2(b) of the act shall take effect in 60 days.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0114PN0751 - 4 - 123456789101112